Montana, session 2025, SB275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-3-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-3-211. Agricultural covenant -- change in use. (1) A change in use for anything other than
agricultural purposes subjects a division of land that received an exemption under 76-3-207(1)(c) to subdivision
review under parts 5 and 6 of this chapter. However, the governing body, in its discretion, may revoke the
covenant provided for in 76-3-207(1)(c) for the purposes of this chapter and the division may proceed without
subdivision review if:
(a) the original lot lines are restored through aggregation of the covenanted land prior to or in
conjunction with the revoking of the covenant; or
(b) a government or public entity seeks to use the land for public purposes as defined in the
governing body's review criteria pursuant to 76-3-504(1)(p); or
(c) the land is annexed into a municipality.
(2) If a governing body proposes to revoke a covenant pursuant to subsection (1)(b), the governing
body shall hold a public hearing. Within 15 days of the hearing, the governing body shall issue written findings
of fact and a decision based on the record. If the governing body approves the revoking of the covenant, the
approval must be recorded with the clerk and recorder.
(3) The revocation of a covenant pursuant to this section does not affect sanitary restrictions
imposed under Title 76, chapter 4."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 275
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 275, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 275
INTRODUCED BY F. MANDEVILLE
AN ACT PROVIDING THAT A GOVERNING BODY MAY REVOKE AN AGRICULTURAL COVENANT AND
DIVISION OF THE LAND MAY PROCEED WITHOUT SUBDIVISION REVIEW IF THE LAND IS ANNEXED INTO
A MUNICIPALITY; AND AMENDING SECTION 76-3-211, MCA.